Hawaii statutes.
[§21D-3] Warranty; limitation of liability.
Use of the ACCESS/legislative information service on the HAWIAN gateway network
is at the sole risk of the user. The legislature makes no warranty or
representation of any kind, either express or implied. The legislature
provides access to legislative information and services on an "as is"
basis, and it shall not be liable or held responsible: for any unintentional
omission, addition, or error in or loss of service or data; for any breakdown,
interruption, or delay in service; or for any other failure or inability of the
legislature to provide services or data resulting directly or indirectly from
any cause or circumstances. [L 1990, c 348, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next